Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 48 Feral Livestock

§ 11-48-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Wyoming livestock board;

“Director” means the director of the Wyoming livestock board;

“Feral” means a domestic animal that is not under the control of nor cared for by a person and which has returned to a wild or semi-wild state. A feral animal may or may not be owned by a person;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 21, § 2.

“Disposal” means as defined in W.S. 11-24-101(a)(iv);

“Livestock” means as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(xvi).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 88, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2011, ch. 21, §§ 1, 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(v) and (a)(vi).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), inserted “A feral animal may or may not be owned by a person,” repealed former (a)(iv) pertaining to definition of livestock, and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 88, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 11-48-102.
Disposition
of feral livestock; penalty.

Before any livestock can be declared feral, a reasonable attempt shall be made by the director or the state veterinarian to locate and identify the owner of the livestock and to notify the owner to take possession of the livestock. If the owner repeatedly refuses to take possession of the livestock, he shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this section.

If the state veterinarian or the director are unable to identify and notify the owner of the livestock or the owner refused to take possession for the livestock within five (5) days after receiving notice, the livestock may be declared to be feral livestock.

If the director or the state veterinarian determines that any feral livestock are damaging private or public property, including grass, cultivated crops or stored crops, or determines the feral livestock is on private or public property where the feral livestock are not authorized to be and that capturing the feral livestock is not feasible or is cost prohibitive, the director or the state veterinarian may order the disposal of the feral livestock.

If the state veterinarian determines or suspects any feral livestock are likely to be infected with or able to spread any infectious or contagious disease, the state veterinarian may order the destruction of the feral livestock.

There shall be no right for any future indemnity or payment to the owner for the disposition of any feral livestock disposed of in accordance with this section. Should the owner of any feral livestock disposed of in accordance with this section be subsequently identified, the board may seek reimbursement from the owner for all costs associated with the disposal and removal of the feral livestock.

The Wyoming livestock board shall promulgate rules necessary for the administration of this section.

The owner of feral livestock shall be:

Responsible for all damages caused by the feral livestock; and

Responsible for the costs of gathering, feeding, veterinary services, transportation and other incidental expenses relating to the feral livestock incurred by the Wyoming livestock board.

Any person failing to comply with this section shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 88, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2011, ch. 21, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “disposal” for “destruction” in (c) and made similar changes in (e).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added the second sentence; and added (g) and (h).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 88, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.